California statutes. Public Resources Code
-------------------------------------------

5093.40.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1196.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.4. California Wild and Scenic Rivers Act [5093.50. - 5093.71.]

5093.50.

It is the policy of the State of California that certain rivers which possess extraordinary scenic, recreational, fishery, or wildlife values shall be preserved in their free-flowing state, together with their immediate environments, for the benefit and enjoyment of the people of the state. The Legislature declares that such use of these rivers is the highest and most beneficial use and is a reasonable and beneficial use of water within the meaning of Section 2 of Article X of the California Constitution. It is the purpose of this chapter to create a California Wild and Scenic Rivers System to be administered in accordance with the provisions of this
 chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1481, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.51.

This chapter shall be known as the California Wild and Scenic Rivers Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1259.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.52.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Secretary” means the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency.

(b) “Natural Resources Agency” means the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency and any constituent units of the Resources Agency that the secretary determines to be necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

(c) “River” means the water, bed, and shoreline of rivers, streams, channels, lakes, bays, estuaries, marshes, wetlands, and lagoons, up to the first line of permanently established riparian vegetation.

(d) “Free-flowing” means existing or flowing without artificial impoundment, diversion, or other modification of the river. The presence of low dams, diversion works, and other minor structures does not automatically bar a river’s inclusion within the system. However, this subdivision does not authorize or encourage future construction of those structures on any component of the system.

(e) “System” means the California Wild and Scenic Rivers System.

(f) “Land use regulation” means the regulation by any state or local governmental entity, agency, or official of any activities that take place other than directly on the waters of the segments of the rivers designated in Section 5093.54.

(g) “Director” means the Director of Fish and Wildlife.

(h) “Immediate environments” means the land immediately adjacent to the segments of the rivers designated in Section 5093.54.

(i) “Special treatment areas” means, for purposes of this chapter, those areas defined as special treatment areas in Section 895.1 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, as in effect on January 1, 2004, as that definition applies to wild and scenic river segments designated from time to time in Section 5093.54, and also includes areas within 200 feet of the watercourse transition line of a state-designated recreational river segment designated in Section 5093.54 that may be at risk during timber operations.

(j) “Board” means the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 401, Sec. 9.   (AB 1520)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.53.

Those rivers or segments of rivers included in the system shall be classified as one of the following:

(a) Wild rivers, which are those rivers or segments of rivers that are free of impoundments and generally inaccessible except by trail, with watersheds or shorelines essentially primitive and waters unpolluted.

(b) Scenic rivers, which are those rivers or segments of rivers that are free of impoundments, with shorelines or watersheds still largely primitive and shorelines largely undeveloped, but accessible in places by
 roads.

(c) Recreational rivers, which are those rivers or segments of rivers that are readily accessible by road or railroad, that may have some development along their shorelines, and that may have undergone some impoundment or diversion in the past.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1481, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.54.

The following rivers and segments thereof are designated as components of the system:

(a) Klamath River. The main stem from 100 yards below Iron Gate Dam to the Pacific Ocean; the Scott River from the mouth of Shackleford Creek west of Fort Jones to the river mouth near Hamburg; the Salmon River from Cecilville Bridge to the river mouth near Somes Bar; the North Fork of the Salmon River from the intersection of the river with the south boundary of the Marble Mountain Wilderness area to the river mouth; Wooley Creek from the western boundary of the Marble Mountain Wilderness area to its confluence with the Salmon River.

(b) Trinity River. The main stem from 100 yards below Lewiston
 Dam to the river mouth at Weitchpec; the North Fork of the Trinity from the intersection of the river with the southern boundary of the Salmon-Trinity Primitive Area downstream to the river mouth at Helena; New River from the intersection of the river with the southern boundary of the Salmon-Trinity Primitive Area downstream to the river mouth near Burnt Ranch; South Fork of the Trinity from the junction of the river with State Highway Route 36 to the river mouth near Salyer.

(c) Smith River. The main stem from the confluence of the Middle and South Forks to its mouth at the Pacific Ocean; the Middle Fork from its source about three miles south of Sanger Lake as depicted on 1956 USGS 15´ “Preston Peak” topographic map to the middle of Section 7 T17N R5E; the Middle Fork from the middle of Section 7 T17N R5E to the middle of Section 6 T17N R5E; the Middle Fork from the middle of Section 6 T17N R5E to one-half mile upstream from the confluence
 with Knopki Creek; the Middle Fork from one-half mile upstream from the confluence with Knopki Creek to the confluence with the South Fork; Myrtle Creek from its source in Section 9 T17N R1E as depicted on 1952 USGS 15´ “Crescent City” topographic map to the middle of Section 28 T17N R1E; Myrtle Creek, from the middle of Section 28 T17N R1E to the confluence with the Middle Fork; Shelly Creek from its source in Section 1 T18N R3E as depicted on 1951 USGS 15´ “Gasquet” topographic map to the confluence with Patrick Creek; Kelly Creek from its source in Section 32 T17N R3E as depicted on 1951 USGS 15´ “Gasquet” topographic map to the confluence with the Middle Fork; Packsaddle Creek from its source about 0.8 miles southwest of Broken Rib Mountain as depicted on 1956 USGS 15´ “Preston Peak” topographic map to the eastern boundary of Section 3 T17N R1E; Packsaddle Creek from the eastern boundary of Section 3 T17N R4E to the northern boundary of Section 3 T17N R4E; Packsaddle Creek from the northern boundary of
 Section 3 T17N R4E to the confluence with the Middle Fork; East Fork Patrick Creek from its source in Section 10 T18N R3E as depicted on 1951 USGS 15´ “Gasquet” topographic map to the confluence with West Fork Patrick Creek; West Fork Patrick Creek from its source in Section 18 T18N R3E as depicted on 1951 15´ “Gasquet” topographic map to the confluence with East Fork Patrick Creek; Griffin Creek from its source about 0.2 miles southwest of Hazel View Summit as depicted on 1956 USGS 15´ “Preston Peak” topographic map to the confluence with the Middle Fork; Knopki Creek from its source about 0.4 miles west of Sanger Peak as depicted on 1956 USGS 15´ “Preston Peak” topographic map to the confluence with Middle Fork; Monkey Creek from its source in the northeast quadrant of Section 12 T18N R3E as depicted on 1951 USGS 15´ “Gasquet” topographic map to the northern boundary of Section 26 T18N R3E; Monkey Creek from the northern boundary of Section 26 T18N R3E to the confluence with the Middle Fork; Patrick Creek
 from the junction of the East and West Forks of Patrick Creek to the confluence with Middle Fork; the North Fork from the California-Oregon boundary to the confluence with an unnamed tributary in the northern quarter Section 5 T18N R2E as depicted on 1951 USGS 15´ “Gasquet” topographic map; the North Fork from the confluence with an unnamed tributary in northern quarter of Section 5 T18N R2E to the southernmost intersection of eastern boundary Section 5 T18N R2E as depicted on 1951 USGS 15´ “Gasquet” topographic map; the North Fork from the southernmost intersection of the eastern boundary Section 5 T18N R2E as depicted on 1951 USGS 15´ “Gasquet” topographic map to the confluence with Stony Creek; the North Fork from the confluence with Stony Creek to the confluence with the Middle Fork; Diamond Creek from the California-Oregon state boundary to the confluence with High Plateau Creek; Diamond Creek from the confluence with High Plateau Creek to the confluence with the North Fork; Bear Creek from its source
 in Section 24 T18N R2E as depicted on 1951 USGS 15´ “Gasquet” topographic map to the confluence with Diamond Creek; Still Creek from its source in Section 11 T18N R1E as depicted on 1952 USGS 15´ “Crescent City” topographic map to the confluence with the North Fork Smith River; North Fork Diamond Creek from the California-Oregon state boundary to the confluence with Diamond Creek; High Plateau Creek from its source in Section 26 T18N R2E as depicted on 1951 USGS 15´ “Gasquet” topographic map to northern boundary Section 23 T18N R2E; High Plateau Creek from the northern boundary Section 23 T18N R2E to the confluence with Diamond Creek; the Siskiyou Fork from its source about 0.7 miles southeast of Broken Rib Mountain as depicted on 1956 USGS 15´ “Preston Peak” topographic map to the confluence with the South Siskiyou Fork; the Siskiyou Fork from its confluence with the South Siskiyou Fork to the confluence with the Middle Fork; the South Siskiyou Fork from its source about 0.6 miles southwest of Buck Lake as
 depicted on 1956 USGS 15´ “Preston Peak” topographic map to the confluence with the Siskiyou Fork; the South Fork from its source about 0.5 miles southwest of Bear Mountain as depicted on 1956 USGS 15´ “Preston Peak” topographic map to Blackhawk Bar; the South Fork from Blackhawk Bar to the confluence with the Middle Fork; Williams Creek from its source in Section 31 T14N R4E as depicted on 1952 USGS 15´ “Ship Mountain” topographic map to the confluence with Eight Mile Creek; Eight Mile Creek from its source in Section 29 T14N R4E as depicted on 1955 USGS 15´ “Dillon Mountain” topographic map to the confluence with the South Fork; the Prescott Fork from its source about 0.5 miles southeast of Island Lake as depicted on 1955 USGS 15´ “Dillon Mountain” topographic map to the confluence with the South Fork; Quartz Creek from its source in Section 31 T16N R4E as depicted on 1952 USGS 15´ “Ship Mountain” topographic map to the confluence with the South Fork; Jones Creek from its source in Section 36 T16N R3E as
 depicted on 1952 USGS 15´ “Ship Mountain” topographic map to the middle of Section 5 T15N R3E; Jones Creek from the middle of Section 5 T15N R3E to the confluence with the South Fork; Hurdygurdy Creek from its source about 0.4 miles southwest of Bear Basin Butte as depicted on 1956 USGS 15´ “Preston Peak” topographic map to the confluence with the South Fork; Gordon Creek from its source in Section 18 T16N R3E as depicted on 1951 USGS 15´ “Gasquet” topographic map to the confluence with the South Fork; Coon Creek from the junction of the two-source tributaries in the southwest quadrant of Section 31 T17N R3E as depicted on 1951 USGS 15´ “Gasquet” topographic map to the western boundary Section 14 T16N R2E; Coon Creek from the western boundary Section 14 T16N R2E to the confluence with the South Fork; Craigs Creek from its source in Section 36 T17N R2E as depicted on 1951 USGS 15´ “Gasquet” topographic map to the confluence with the South Fork; Buck Creek from its source at Cedar Camp Spring as depicted on
 1952 USGS 15´ “Ship Mountain” topographic map to the confluence with the South Fork; Muzzleloader Creek from its source in Section 2 T15N R3E as depicted on 1952 USGS 15´ “Ship Mountain” topographic map to the confluence with Jones Creek; Canthook Creek from its source in Section 2 T15N R2E as depicted on 1952 USGS 15´ “Ship Mountain” topographic map to the confluence with South Fork.

(d) Eel River. The main stem from 100 yards below Van Arsdale Dam to the Pacific Ocean; the South Fork of the Eel from the mouth of Section Four Creek near Branscomb to the river mouth below Weott; Middle Fork of the Eel from the intersection of the river with the southern boundary of the Middle Eel-Yolla Bolly Wilderness Area to the river mouth at Dos Rios; North Fork of the Eel from the Old Gilman Ranch downstream to the river mouth near Ramsey; Van Duzen River from Dinsmores Bridge downstream to the river mouth near Fortuna.

(e) American River. The North Fork from its source to the Iowa Hill Bridge; the Lower American from Nimbus Dam to its junction with the Sacramento River.

(f) (1) West Walker River. The main stem from its source to the confluence with Rock Creek near the town of Walker; Leavitt Creek from Leavitt Falls to the confluence with the main stem of the West Walker River.

(2) Carson River. The East Fork from the Hangman’s Bridge crossing of State Highway Route 89 to the California-Nevada border.

(3) The Legislature finds and declares that, because the East Fork Carson River and West Walker River are interstate streams, and a source of agricultural water and domestic water for communities within the Counties of Alpine and Mono where they
 originate, it is necessary that the following special provisions apply:

(A) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to prohibit the replacement of diversions or changes in the purpose of use, place of use, or point of diversion under existing water rights, except that (i) no replacement or change shall operate to increase the adverse effect, if any, of the preexisting diversion facility or place or purpose of use, upon the free-flowing condition and natural character of the stream, and (ii) after January 1, 1990, no new diversion shall be constructed unless and until the secretary determines that the facility is needed to supply domestic water to the residents of any county through which the river or segment flows and that the facility will not adversely affect the free-flowing condition and natural character of the stream.

(B) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as
 quantifying or otherwise affecting any equitable apportionment, or as establishing any upper limit, between the State of California and the State of Nevada of the waters of these streams.

(g) (1) The South Yuba River: From Lang Crossing to its confluence with Kentucky Creek below Bridgeport.

(2) Nothing in this subdivision shall prejudice, alter, delay, interfere with, or affect in any way, the existing rights of the Placer County Water Agency; the implementation of those rights; any historic water use practices; the replacement, maintenance, repair, operation, or future expansion of existing diversions, storage, powerhouses, or conveyance facilities or other works by the Placer County Water Agency; or changes in the purpose of use, places of use, points of diversion, or ownership of those existing water rights; nor shall anything in this subdivision preclude
 the issuance of any governmental authorization needed for utilization of those rights, except that no changes shall operate to increase the adverse effect, if any, of the preexisting facilities or places, or the purposes of use upon the free-flowing and natural character of the river segment designated in this subdivision.

(h) Albion River. The Albion River from one-fourth mile upstream of its confluence with Deadman Gulch downstream to its mouth at the Pacific Ocean.

(i) Gualala River. The main stem Gualala River from the confluence of the North and South Forks to the Pacific Ocean.

(j) (1) Cache Creek from one-fourth mile below Cache Creek Dam to Camp Haswell.

(2) North Fork Cache Creek from the Highway 20 bridge to the
 confluence with the main stem.

(3) The designation of Cache Creek under paragraphs (1) and (2) shall not prejudice, alter, delay, interfere with, or affect in any way, the existing water rights of the Yolo County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, or public water agencies within the Cache Creek watershed lying in the County of Lake, including the range of operations permitted under these existing water rights; any historic water use practices within existing water rights; or the replacement, maintenance, repair, or future expansion within existing water rights of existing diversion, storage, powerhouse, or conveyance facilities or other works by the Yolo County Flood Control and Water Conservation District or public water agencies within the Cache Creek watershed lying in the County of Lake.

(4) The designation of Cache Creek under paragraphs (1) and (2) shall not
 prejudice, alter, delay, interfere with, or affect any changes to the existing water rights of the Yolo County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, including changes to the purpose of use, place of use, points of diversion, quantity of water diverted, or ownership, or applications by the district for new water rights; provided, that the changes or applications do not involve the construction of a dam, reservoir, diversion, or other water impoundment facility within the segments of Cache Creek designated in paragraphs (1) and (2). Any such change or application shall be subject to all applicable constitutional, statutory, and judicial requirements, including the public trust doctrine.

(5) As the waters of the Cache Creek watershed are the sole source of supply within that watershed for the County of Lake, the designation of Cache Creek under paragraphs (1) and (2) shall not prejudice, alter, delay, interfere with, or affect any changes
 to the existing water rights of the public water agencies within the Cache Creek watershed lying in the County of Lake, including changes to the purpose of use, place of use, points of diversion, quantity of water diverted, or ownership, or applications by these agencies for new water rights; provided, that the changes or applications do not involve the construction of a dam, reservoir, diversion, or other water impoundment facility within the segments of Cache Creek designated in paragraphs (1) and (2). Any such change or application shall be subject to all applicable constitutional, statutory, and judicial requirements, including the public trust doctrine.

(6) (A) The designation of Cache Creek under paragraphs (1) and (2) shall not impair or affect in any way activities to manage or remove invasive or nonnative plants and animal species.

(B) The designation of Cache Creek under
 paragraphs (1) and (2) shall not impair or affect in any way activities to remediate mercury pollution; provided, that this activity does not involve the construction of a dam, reservoir, diversion, or other water impoundment facility within the segments of Cache Creek designated in paragraphs (1) and (2).

(7) (A) Neither the Governor nor an employee of a state agency or department shall apply to a secretary, department, agency, or other entity of the federal government for the designation of any portion of Cache Creek as a component of the national wild and scenic rivers system under the federal Wild and Scenic Rivers Act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1271 et seq.).

(B) Neither the Governor nor an employee of a state agency or department shall expend funds preparing, filing, or otherwise submitting an application to a secretary, department, or other entity of the federal
 government for the designation of any portion of Cache Creek as a component of the national wild and scenic rivers system under the federal Wild and Scenic Rivers Act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1271 et seq.).

(8) To the extent that this subdivision conflicts with other provisions of this chapter, this subdivision shall control.

(k) (1) Mokelumne River. The following segments are designated:

(A) Segment A1: North Fork Mokelumne River from 0.50 miles downstream of the Salt Springs Dam to Bear River confluence.

(B) Segment A2: North Fork Mokelumne River from the Bear River confluence to 0.50 miles upstream of the Tiger Creek Powerhouse.

(C) Segment B: North Fork Mokelumne River
 from 1,000 feet downstream of the Tiger Creek Afterbay Dam to State Highway Route 26 (SR-26).

(D) Segment C1: North Fork Mokelumne River from 400 feet downstream of the small reregulating dam at the outlet of the West Point Powerhouse to the southern boundary of Section 12, T6N R12E.

(E) Segment C2: Section 12 boundary to confluence of the North and Middle Forks Mokelumne River.

(F) Segment D: Mokelumne River from the confluence of the North and Middle Forks to 300 feet upstream of the Electra Powerhouse.

(G) Segment E: Mokelumne River from 300 feet downstream of the small reregulating dam downstream of the Electra Powerhouse to the Pardee Reservoir flood surcharge pool at 580 feet elevation above mean sea level.

(2) The designation of the Mokelumne River segments under paragraph (1) is subject to all of the following special provisions:

(A) The designation of the identified segments of the Mokelumne River into the system shall not prejudice, alter, delay, interfere with, or affect in any way, the existing water rights of the Pacific Gas and Electric Company or public water agencies in the Counties of Alpine, Amador, and Calaveras, including the Amador Water Agency’s pending water right application 5647X03; the range of operations permitted under these existing water rights; any historic consumptive water use practices within existing water rights; full utilization of existing water rights, including changes in the purposes of use, places of use, points of diversion, quantities of water diverted or ownership; or the replacement, maintenance, repair, rehabilitation or alteration, or operation
 of facilities with no or negligible expansion of capacity within existing water rights of existing diversion, storage, powerhouse, or conveyance facilities or other works by the Pacific Gas and Electric Company or public water agencies in the Counties of Alpine, Amador, and Calaveras. Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude the issuance of any governmental authorization or financial assistance needed for full utilization of those rights. No such changes shall cause an adverse effect upon the free-flowing condition, natural character, immediate environments, or extraordinary scenic or recreational values of the river segments designated herein, provided that the existing water rights and facilities may be utilized to their fullest extent in accordance with applicable law. For the purposes of this designation, an adverse effect will be considered to be significant impairment to flows that would otherwise exist within designated segments.

(B) The designation of the identified segments of the Mokelumne River into the system shall not prejudice, alter, delay, interfere with, or affect any applications for new water rights by the Pacific Gas and Electric Company, or any applications for new water rights or unappropriated water that may be available under State Filings 5647 and 5648 by public water agencies in the Counties of Alpine, Amador, and Calaveras, provided that the applications do not involve the construction of a dam, reservoir, other water impoundment facility within the designated segments, impound water on a designated segment, or diversion on a designated segment in a manner inconsistent with this chapter, nor cause an adverse effect upon the free-flowing condition, natural character, immediate environments, or extraordinary scenic or recreational values, or both, of the river segments designated herein. Any change, application, or future new projects or existing projects with significant expansion in capacity under
 this subdivision shall be subject to a determination that any such future changes will not cause an adverse effect upon the free-flowing condition, natural character, immediate environments, or extraordinary scenic or recreational values of the river segments designated herein. Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude the issuance of any governmental authorization or financial assistance needed for the feasibility study and review pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) of any such change, application, or projects. For the purposes of this designation, an adverse effect will be considered to be significant impairment to flows that would otherwise exist within designated segments.

(C) The designation of the identified segments of the Mokelumne River into the system shall not prejudice, alter, affect in any way, or interfere with the maintenance, repair, or operation by the Pacific Gas
 and Electric Company of the Mokelumne River Project (FERC No. 137) currently under the 2001 Federal Energy Regulatory Commission license for the project, the incorporated settlement agreement, any license amendments made with the agreement of the parties to the incorporated settlement agreement, and any adjustment of flows permitted to occur pursuant to the license for enhancement of ecological and recreational resources. The designation of the identified segments of the Mokelumne River into the state wild and scenic rivers system shall not prejudice, alter, affect in any way or interfere with the maintenance, repair, or recreational opportunities of the Roaring Camp Mining Company and its associated structures, facilities, and land.

(D) Neither the Governor nor an employee of a state agency or department shall expend funds preparing, filing, applying, nominating, or otherwise submitting an application to a secretary, department, agency, or
 other entity of the federal government to include any segment designated herein into the National Wild and Scenic Rivers System under the National Wild and Scenic Rivers Act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1271(2)(a)(ii)).

(E) To the extent that these special provisions conflict with other provisions of this chapter, this subdivision shall control.

(l) Other rivers which qualify for inclusion in the system may be recommended to the Legislature by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 23.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.541.

(a) Notwithstanding the fact that the tributaries of the Smith River specified in this subdivision are not included in the system, no dam, reservoir, diversion, or other water impoundment facility shall be constructed on any of the following tributaries of the Smith River:

(1) Dominie Creek.

(2) Rowdy Creek.

(3) South Fork Rowdy Creek.

(4) Savoy Creek.

(5) Little Mill Creek.

(6) Bummer Lake Creek.

(7) East Fork Mill Creek.

(8) West Branch Mill Creek.

(9) Rock Creek.

(10) Goose Creek.

(11) East Fork Goose Creek.

(12) Mill Creek.

(b) All state agencies exercising powers under any other provision of law with respect to the protection and restoration of fishery resources shall continue to exercise those powers in a manner to protect and restore fishery resources in the tributaries
 specified in subdivision (a). In carrying out the provisions of this subdivision, any exercise of powers shall be consistent with the provisions of Section 5093.58.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1481, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.542.

The Legislature finds and declares that the McCloud River possesses extraordinary resources in that it supports one of the finest wild trout fisheries in the state. Portions of the river have been appropriately designated by the Fish and Game Commission, pursuant to Chapter 7.2 (commencing with Section 1725) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code, as wild trout waters, with restrictions on the taking, or method of taking, of fish. The Legislature has determined, based upon a review of comprehensive technical data evaluating resources and potential beneficial uses, that potential beneficial uses must be balanced, in order to achieve protection of the unique fishery resources of the McCloud River, as follows:

(a) The continued management of river resources in their existing natural condition represents the best way to protect the unique fishery of the McCloud River. The Legislature further finds and declares that maintaining the McCloud River in its free-flowing condition to protect its fishery is the highest and most beneficial use of the waters of the McCloud River within the segments designated in subdivision (b), and is a reasonable use of water within the meaning of Section 2 of Article X of the California Constitution.

(b) A dam, reservoir, diversion, or other water impoundment facility shall not be constructed on the McCloud River from Algoma to the confluence with Huckleberry Creek, and 0.25 mile downstream from the McCloud Dam to the McCloud River Bridge and such a
 facility shall not be constructed on Yét Atwam Creek from the confluence with Cabin Creek to the confluence with the McCloud River.

(c) Except for participation by the Department of Water Resources in studies involving the technical and economic feasibility of enlargement of Shasta Dam, a department or agency of the state shall not assist or cooperate with, whether by loan, grant, license, or otherwise, any agency of the federal, state, or local government in the planning or construction of any dam, reservoir, diversion, or other water impoundment facility that could have an adverse effect on the free-flowing condition of the McCloud River, or on its wild trout fishery.

(d) A state agency exercising powers under any other law with respect to the protection and restoration of
 fishery resources shall continue to exercise those powers in a manner to protect and enhance the fishery of those segments designated in subdivision (b). In carrying out this subdivision, the exercise of powers shall be consistent with Section 5093.58.

(e) This section does not prejudice, alter, affect in any way, or interfere with the construction, maintenance, repair, or operation by the Pacific Gas and Electric Company of the existing McCloud-Pit development (FERC 2106) under its license, or prevent Pacific Gas and Electric from constructing a hydroelectric generating facility by retrofitting the existing McCloud Dam if the operation of the facility does not alter the existing flow regime below the dam.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 401, Sec. 10.   (AB 1520)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.545.

The classifications heretofore established by the secretary for the rivers or segments of rivers included in the system are revised and adopted as follows:RiversClassification(a)Klamath River: The Klamath River from theFERC Project 2082 downstream boundary
in Section 17 T47N R5W as shown on
Exhibit K-7 sheet 1 dated May 25, 1962, to
the river mouth at the Pacific OceanRecreational(b)Scott River:(1)The Scott River from Shackleford Creek to
McCarthy CreekRecreational(2)The Scott River from McCarthy Creek to
Scott BarScenic(3)The Scott River from Scott Bar to the
confluence with the Klamath RiverRecreational(c)Salmon River:(1)The Salmon River from the Forks of
Salmon to the
 Lewis Creek confluenceRecreational(2)The Salmon River from the Lewis Creek
confluence to the Wooley Creek confluenceScenic(3)The Salmon River from the Wooley Creek
confluence to the confluence with the
Klamath RiverRecreational(4)The South Fork of the Salmon River from
Cecilville to St. Claire Creek confluenceRecreational(5)The South Fork from St. Claire Creek
confluence to the Matthews Creek
confluenceScenic(6)The South Fork from Matthews Creek
confluence to the Forks of SalmonRecreational(7)The North Fork of the Salmon River from
Marble Mountain Wilderness boundary to
Mule Bridge Campground in Section 35
T12N R11W and Section 12 T11N R11WWild(8)The North Fork from Mule Bridge
Campground to the Forks of SalmonRecreational(9)Wooley Creek
 from the Marble Mountain
Wilderness Area boundary to12 mile
upstream of the confluence with Salmon
RiverWild(10)Wooley Creek downstream12 mile above
the confluence with the Salmon RiverRecreational(d)Trinity River:(1)The Trinity River from 100 yards below
Lewiston Dam to Cedar Flat Creek
confluenceRecreational(2)The Trinity River from Cedar Flat Creek
confluence to Gray FallsScenic(3)The Trinity River from Gray Falls to the
west boundary of Section 2 T8N R4ERecreational(4)The Trinity River from the west boundary
of Section 2 T8N R4E to the confluence
with the Klamath River at WeitchpecScenic(5)The North Fork of the Trinity River from
the Trinity Alps Primitive Area boundary to
north boundary Section 20 T34N R11WWild(6)The North Fork from the north boundary
Section 20 T34N R11W to mouthRecreational(7)The South Fork Trinity River from Forest
Glen to Hidden Valley RanchWild(8)The South Fork from Hidden Valley Ranch
to the Naufus Creek confluence in Section 8
T1N R7EScenic(9)The South Fork from the Naufus Creek
confluence in Section 8 T1N R7E to
Johnson Creek confluence near the
boundary of Sections 13 and 14 T2N R6EWild(10)The South Fork from Johnson Creek
confluence near the boundary of Sections 13
and 14 T2N R6E to the boundary of
Sections 25 and 36 T2N R6EScenic(11)The South Fork from the boundary of
Sections 25 and 36 T2N R6E to the
footbridge near the mouth of Underwood
Creek in Section 17 T4N R6E Humboldt
Base and MeridianRecreational(12)The South Fork from the footbridge near the
mouth of Underwood Creek in Section 17
T4N R6E to Todd Ranch in Section 18 T5N
R5EWild(13)The South Fork from Todd Ranch in Section
18 T5N R5E to the confluence with Main
TrinityScenic(14)New River from the Salmon Trinity
Primitive Area boundary to the junction
with the East Fork New River in Section 23
T7N R7EWild(15)New River from the junction with the East
Fork New River in Section 23 T7N R7E to
100 yards below Panther Creek
Campground in Section 18 T6N R7ERecreational(16)New River from 100 yards below Panther
Creek Campground in Section 18 T6N R7E
to Dyer Creek confluence in Section 25
T26N R6EScenic(17)New River from Dyer Creek confluence in
Section 25 T26N R6E to the confluence
with Trinity RiverWild(e)Smith River:(1)Smith River from the confluence of the
Middle and South Forks to its mouth at the
Pacific OceanRecreational(2)Middle Fork Smith River from its source
about 3 miles south of Sanger
 Lake as
depicted on 1956 USGS 15´ “Preston Peak”
topographic map to the middle of Section 7
T17N R5EWild(3)Middle Fork Smith River from the middle
of Section 7 T17N R5E to the middle of
Section 6 T17N R5EScenic(4)Middle Fork Smith River from middle of
Section 6 T17N R5E to one-half mile
upstream from the confluence with Knopki
CreekWild(5)Middle Fork Smith River from one-half
mile upstream from the confluence with
Knopki Creek to the confluence with South
Fork Smith RiverRecreational(6)Myrtle Creek from its source in Section 9
T17N R1E as depicted on 1952 USGS 15´
“Crescent City” topographic map to the
middle of Section 28 T17N R1ERecreational(7)Myrtle Creek from the middle of Section 28
T17N R1E to the confluence
 with the
Middle Fork Smith RiverRecreational(8)Shelly Creek from its source in Section 1
T18N R3E as depicted on 1951 USGS 15´
“Gasquet” topographic map to the
confluence with Patrick CreekRecreational(9)Kelly Creek from its source in Section 32
T17N R3E as depicted on 1951 USGS 15´
“Gasquet” topographic map to the
confluence with the Middle Fork Smith
RiverRecreational(10)Packsaddle Creek from its source about 0.8
miles southwest of Broken Rib Mountain as
depicted on 1956 USGS 15´ “Preston Peak”
topographic map to the eastern boundary of
Section 3 T17N R1ERecreational(11)Packsaddle Creek from the eastern
boundary of Section 3 T17N R4E to the
northern boundary of Section 3 T17N R4ERecreational(12)Packsaddle Creek from the
 northern
boundary of Section 3 T17N R4E to the
confluence with the Middle Fork of Smith
RiverRecreational(13)East Fork Patrick Creek from its source in
Section 10 T18N R3E as depicted on 1951
USGS 15´ “Gasquet” topographic map to
the confluence with the West Fork Patrick
CreekRecreational(14)West Fork Patrick Creek from its source in
Section 18 T18N R3E as depicted on 1951
USGS 15´ “Gasquet” topographic map to
the confluence with the East Fork Patrick
CreekRecreational(15)Griffin Creek from its source about 0.2
miles southwest of Hazel View Summit as
depicted on 1956 USGS 15´ “Preston Peak”
topographic map to the confluence with the
Middle Fork Smith RiverRecreational(16)Knopki Creek from its source about 0.4
miles west of Sanger Peak as depicted on
1956 USGS 15´ “Preston Peak” topographic
map to the confluence with the Middle Fork
Smith RiverRecreational(17)Monkey Creek from its source in the
northeast quadrant of Section 12 T18N R3E
as depicted on 1951 USGS 15´ “Gasquet”
topographic map to the northern boundary
of Section 26 T18N R3ERecreational(18)Monkey Creek from the northern boundary
of Section 26 T18N R3E to the confluence
with the Middle Fork of Smith RiverRecreational(19)Patrick Creek from
 the junction of East and
West Forks of Patrick Creek to the
confluence with the Middle Fork Smith
RiverRecreational(20)North Fork Smith River from the
California-Oregon boundary to the
confluence with an unnamed tributary in the
northern quarter Section 5 T18N R2E as
depicted on 1951 USGS 15´ “Gasquet”
topographic mapWild(21)North Fork Smith River from the
confluence with an unnamed tributary in the
northern quarter of Section 5 T18N R2E to
the southernmost intersection of
 the
eastern boundary of Section 5 T18N R2E
as depicted on 1951 USGS 15´ “Gasquet”
topographic mapScenic(22)North Fork Smith River from the
southernmost intersection of the eastern
boundary Section 5 T18N R2E as depicted
on 1951 USGS 15´ “Gasquet” topographic
map to the confluence with Stony CreekWild(23)North Fork Smith River from the
confluence with Stony Creek to the
confluence with the Middle Fork of the
Smith RiverRecreational(24)Diamond Creek from the California-Oregon
state boundary to the confluence with High
Plateau CreekRecreational(25)Diamond Creek from the confluence with
High Plateau Creek to the confluence with
the North Fork Smith RiverRecreational(26)Bear Creek from its source in Section 24
T18N R2E
 as depicted on 1951 USGS 15´
“Gasquet” topographic map to the
confluence with Diamond CreekRecreational(27)Still Creek from its source in Section 11
T18N R1E as depicted on 1952 USGS 15´
“Crescent City” topographic map to the
confluence with the North Fork Smith RiverRecreational(28)North Fork Diamond Creek from the
California-Oregon state boundary to the
confluence with Diamond CreekRecreational(29)High Plateau Creek from its source in
Section 26 T18N R2E as depicted on 1951
USGS 15´ “Gasquet” topographic map to
the northern boundary Section 23 T18N
R2ERecreational(30)High Plateau Creek from the northern
boundary Section 23 T18N R2E to the
confluence with Diamond CreekRecreational(31)Siskiyou Fork of Smith River from its
source about 0.7
 miles southeast of Broken
Rib Mountain as depicted on 1956 USGS
15´ “Preston Peak” topographic map to the
confluence with the South Siskiyou Fork of
the Smith RiverWild(32)Siskiyou Fork of the Smith River from the
confluence with the South Siskiyou Fork of
the Smith River to the confluence with the